District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.02

Qualifications of directors.

A director of a nonprofit corporation shall be an individual. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of the District or a member of the corporation unless the articles or bylaws so prescribe.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720